Hawaii, session 2025, HB871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 130, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024 (Act 130), increases the loan limit for direct loans provided by the department of Hawaiian home lands to seventy-five per cent of the maximum single residence loan amount allowed in Hawaiʻi by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development's Federal Housing Administration, instead of fifty per cent, as currently outlined in section 215 of the Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended. The purpose of this Act is to confirm that Act 130 shall take effect on either the date of the Secretary of the Interior's notification letter to the Congressional Committee Chairpersons that Act 130 meets none of the criteria in title 43 Code of Federal Regulations section 48.20, or on the date that the United States Congress approval becomes law. SECTION 2.  Act 130, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended by amending section 4 to read as follows: "SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect [upon its approval with the consent of the United States Congress;] on the earlier of the date of the Secretary of the Interior's notification letter to the Congressional Committee Chairpersons that this Act meets none of the criteria in title 43 Code of Federal Regulations section 48.20, or on the date that the United States Congress approval becomes law; provided further that the amendments made to section 215, Hawaiian Homes Commission Act, 1920, as amended, by this Act shall not be repealed when Act 107, Session Laws of Hawaii 2000, or Act 85, Session Laws of Hawaii 2008, take effect with the consent of the United States Congress." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval.